New Jersey, session 221, A3845.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.1983, c.382 (C.52:27D-25d) is amended to read as follows: 4.    In addition to any other powers and duties invested in it by law or by the commissioner, the division shall: a.     Provide staff support for the work of the fire safety commission and its advisory councils; b.    Administer and enforce the "Uniform Fire Safety Act," established by P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et al.); c.     Implement training and education programs for the fire service and the public; d.    Administer a fire incident reporting system; e.     Conduct research and master planning for fire safety; [and] f.     In conjunction with the Department of Labor and Department of Health, conduct investigations of fire incidents in which one or more firefighters suffer death or serious injury and identify those measures which may be required to prevent the future occurrence of deaths and serious injuries under similar circumstances and, in furtherance of any such investigation, the division may issue and enforce subpoenas to compel the testimony of any person who might have knowledge of any relevant matters and the production of any relevant documents.  If any investigation conducted under this subsection results in the discovery of any violation of the provisions of the "Uniform Fire Safety Act," P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et al.), the division, as an enforcing agency, may issue a written notice or order pursuant to that act. Any notice or order issued by the Division of Fire Safety pursuant to this subsection may be enforced under section 19 of P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-210) as a notice or order of the commissioner; g.    Manage any Americorps programs related to volunteer firefighters established in this State; and h.    Implement a recruitment program for volunteer firefighters. (cf:  P.L.1993, c.218, s.5) 2.    (New section) There is established in the Department of State a paid service program for volunteer firefighters which shall provide program participants payment for their first year of volunteer service in a firehouse in this State.  The program shall be administered by the Office of Volunteerism in the Department of State.  The Director of the Office of Volunteerism shall establish the necessary procedures and standards for the successful implementation of the program and ensure that all program participants meet the requirements established pursuant to this section. a.     Any resident of this State, who has attained an age of at least 18 years, who enters into an agreement to volunteer for a firehouse in this State for the first time, for at least one year, shall be eligible to receive payment for their first year of service through this program. b.    Once enrolled, a program participant shall receive a monthly stipend in the amount of $750 for each month they spend at least 15 hours participating in the duties of a firefighter of their firehouse.  This shall include time spent conducting drills, responding to calls, performing routine maintenance, and time spent away from the firehouse to receive additional training in firefighting, CPR, first-aid, or any other training essential to the job of a firefighter.  The participant shall not be considered an employee, and shall be entitled to only those benefits available to other volunteers in the firehouse under law. c.     The firehouse shall be responsible for certifying to the Director of Volunteerism that (1) the firehouse has a need for additional volunteers, and (2) program participants who have volunteered with the firehouse have conducted the requisite number of hours each month to receive their monthly stipend. d.    The Office of Volunteerism, in collaboration with municipalities and local firehouses, shall promote the benefits of this program and of a career in firefighting, particularly to the States youth and those seeking to explore new career opportunities in this State, as they deem necessary and appropriate. e.     There is established in the Department of State a special dedicated, non-lapsing fund to be known as the Volunteer Firefighter Fund.  The fund shall consist of all monies appropriated by the Legislature for inclusion in the fund, monies received from federal grants, investment earnings of the fund, and monies contributed to the fund by private sources, to be used for the purposes of this section.  The monies in the fund shall be invested and reinvested by the Department of the Treasury. 3.    (New section) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of State, for deposit in the Volunteer Firefighter Fund established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the sum of $2,000,000 to effectuate the purposes of section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 4.    (New section) a. Each school district is encouraged to sponsor an after school program on the topic of volunteer fire service to interested students enrolled in grades six through eight.  The purpose of the after school program shall be to: (1)   encourage students to learn about fire safety, rescue techniques, and emergency medical services in a safe and educational environment; (2)   promote team building, hands-on activities, leadership skills, and community service; (3)   expose students to volunteer fire, public safety, and first response services for consideration of possible career opportunities; and (4)   establish a recruitment mechanism for volunteer fire departments maintained by any municipality, fire district, regional authority, or county in this State. b.    The after school program may be administered by an external entity, which may include a paid, part-paid, or volunteer fire department maintained by any municipality, fire district, regional authority, or county in this State.  Any person over the age of 18 involved with the after school program shall be required to undergo the criminal record check required pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1986, c.116 (C.18A:6-7.1). c.     The Department of Education shall establish a public awareness campaign to inform the general public about the after school program encouraged pursuant to this section.  The public awareness campaign shall include information that, at a minimum, addresses: (1)   the school districts currently offering the after school program; (2)   the importance of encouraging students to join volunteer fire and first response services for consideration of possible career opportunities; and (3)   informational materials that may assist a school district in sponsoring the after school program. The department shall post the materials associated with the public awareness campaign on its Internet website. d.    Nothing in this section shall be construed as fulfilling the requirement to become a member of the Junior Firefighters Auxiliary established pursuant to N.J.S.40A:14-96. 5.    (New section) As used in sections 5 through 9 of P.L.    c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Program means the Volunteer Firefighter Tuition Remission Program established pursuant to section 6 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). Program participant means a volunteer firefighter receiving tuition remission under the program. 6.    (New section)  a.  There is established in the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority, the Volunteer Firefighter Tuition Remission Program. The purpose of this program shall be to incentivize volunteer firefighting in the State. b.    Under the program, a volunteer firefighter shall be permitted to attend regularly-scheduled courses at a public institution of higher education and receive tuition remission for up to 16 undergraduate course credits or eight graduate course credits per semester, for a maximum of eight semesters. 7.    (New section)  a.  A volunteer firefighter shall be eligible for tuition remission under the program, provided that the volunteer firefighter: (1)   is a resident of the State; (2)   has been accepted to pursue a course of undergraduate study and is enrolled as an undergraduate student in good standing at that institution or accepted to pursue a course of graduate study and is enrolled as a graduate student in good standing at that institution; (3)   has applied for all available State student grants and scholarships and all federal student grants and scholarships for which the volunteer firefighter is eligible; and (4)   certifies to the institution that the volunteer will perform the service required for tuition remission pursuant to paragraph (5) of this subsection; and; (5)   has agreed to serve as a member of a volunteer fire company for a minimum of four years and sign an agreement with the municipality that the volunteer fire company serves pledging four years of service in exchange for tuition remission. b.    Upon completing each semester, a program participant shall submit a transcript to the municipality in which the program participant has an agreement with pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  The program participant shall maintain a 2.0 on a 4.0 scale grade average, or its equivalent, in order to continue eligibility for the program. c.     A program participant who has received tuition credit pursuant to section 6 of P.L.    , c. (C.        )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), but does not fulfill the service requirement pursuant to subsection a. of this section, is terminated from the volunteer fire company for cause, or otherwise fails to comply with any requirement of this section shall become ineligible to receive tuition remission and shall repay the State for all tuition remission funding previously extended to the program participant, including interest, on a pro rata basis from the time of termination or noncompliance. 8.    (New section) Within 90 days of the effective date of sections 5 through 9 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the authority shall establish an application process to provide tuition remission to eligible students under the program. No later than the first day of the fourth month next following the effective date of sections 5 through 9 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the authority shall make the application available and, within a reasonable time frame thereafter, commence approving applications for the program. 9.    (New section)  a.  The State shall reimburse a public institution of higher education for the tuition of each volunteer firefighter who enrolls in the institution pursuant to the provisions of sections 5 through 9 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) to the extent that the tuition cost is not paid through State student grants and scholarships and federal student grants and scholarships for which the volunteer firefighter is eligible. b.    The Legislature shall annually appropriate from the General Fund to the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority amounts as may be necessary to implement the Volunteer Firefighter Tuition Remission Program established pursuant to sections 5 through 9 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 10.  (New section) A county vocational school that includes grades nine through 12, or any combination thereof, shall incorporate instruction on public safety services into the curriculum for students as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education.  The instruction, at a minimum, shall include information on firefighting and emergency medical services. 11.  (New section) The Division of Fire Safety in the Department of Community Affairs shall establish training course material regarding incentives to promote the recruitment and retention of volunteer firefighters.  The training course materials shall include information pertaining to the firefighter recruitment process, including, but not limited to, marketing, advertising, and promotional activities designed to attract volunteer recruits and promote mentorship and communication with recently recruited volunteers.  The training course material shall be distributed to the chief of every duly incorporated volunteer fire company in this State.  The division also shall administer a website dedicated to the recruitment and retention of volunteer firefighters. 12.  (New section)  a.  A taxpayer who is a member of a volunteer fire company shall be allowed a $1,000 credit against the tax otherwise due under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. provided that the taxpayer performs at least 100 hours of volunteer service to a volunteer fire company each year. As used in this section, volunteer fire company means a volunteer fire company organized pursuant to Title 15 of the Revised Statutes or Title 15A of the New Jersey Statutes. b.    The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed pursuant to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year shall be as prescribed by the Director of the Division of Taxation.  The amount of the credit applied against the taxpayers New Jersey gross income tax liability for the taxable year shall not reduce the taxpayers tax liability to an amount less than zero. c.     To be eligible for a credit pursuant to this section, a taxpayer shall obtain certification from the volunteer fire company for which the taxpayer performed volunteer service.  The certification shall note the number of hours that the taxpayer performed volunteer services for the volunteer fire company during the taxable year. d.    The Director of the Division of Taxation shall be authorized to promulgate rules and procedures to effectuate the purposes of this section. 13.  Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall take effect immediately, sections 4 through 10 of this act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to the first full academic year following the date of enactment, section 11 of this act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Community Affairs may take any anticipatory action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of that section, and section 12 of this act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023.